Rhode Island, session 2025, SB196.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-38 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-38. Diabetes treatment.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery or renewed in this state which provides medical coverage that includes coverage for
physician services in a physician’s office, and every policy which provides major medical or similar
comprehensive-type coverage, except for supplemental policies which only provide coverage for
specified diseases and other supplemental policies, shall include coverage for the following
equipment and supplies for the treatment of insulin treated diabetes, non-insulin treated diabetes,
and gestational diabetes, if medically appropriate and prescribed by a physician: blood glucose
monitors and blood glucose monitors for the legally blind, test strips for glucose monitors and/or
visual reading, insulin, injection aids, cartridges for the legally blind, syringes, insulin pumps and
appurtenances to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, and oral agents for controlling blood sugar
and therapeutic/molded shoes for the prevention of amputation.
(b) Upon the approval of new or improved diabetes equipment and supplies by the Food
and Drug Administration, all policies governed by this section shall guarantee coverage of new
diabetes equipment and supplies when medically appropriate and prescribed by a physician. These
policies shall also include coverage, when medically necessary, for diabetes self-management
education to ensure that persons with diabetes are instructed in the self-management and treatment

of their diabetes, including information on the nutritional management of diabetes. The coverage
for self-management education and education relating to medical nutrition therapy shall be limited
to medically necessary visits upon the diagnosis of diabetes, where a physician diagnoses a
significant change in the patient’s symptoms or conditions which necessitate changes in a patient’s
self-management, or where reeducation or refresher training is necessary. This education when
medically necessary and prescribed by a physician, may be provided only by the physician or, upon
his or her referral to an appropriately licensed and certified health care provider and may be
conducted in group settings. Coverage for self-management education and education relating to
medical nutrition therapy shall also include home visits when medically necessary.
(c) Benefit plans offered by an insurer may impose co-payment and/or deductibles for the
benefits mandated by this chapter; however, in no instance shall the co-payment or deductible
amount be greater than the co-payment or deductible amount imposed for other supplies, equipment
or physician office visits. Benefits for services under this section shall be reimbursed in accordance
with the respective principles and mechanisms of reimbursement for each insurer, hospital, or
medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, coverage for equipment and supplies for insulin
administration and glucose monitoring shall have a cap on the amount that a covered person is
required to pay for such equipment and supplies at no more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per a
supply lasting thirty (30) days, or per item when an item is intended to be used for longer than thirty
(30) days. Coverage for such equipment and supplies shall not be subject to any annual deductible.
If the application of the cap to a specific item of equipment or supply before a covered person has
met their plan's deductible would result in health savings account ineligibility under 26 U.S.C. §
223, then the cap would only apply to that specific item of equipment or supply after the covered
person has met their plan's deductible.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-35 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-35. Diabetes treatment.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes coverage for
physician services in a physician’s office, and every policy that provides major medical or similar
comprehensive-type coverage shall include coverage for the following equipment and supplies for
the treatment of insulin treated diabetes, non-insulin treated diabetes, and gestational diabetes when
medically appropriate and prescribed by a physician: blood glucose monitors and blood glucose
monitors for the legally blind, test strips for glucose monitors and/or visual reading, insulin,
LC000999 - Page 2 of 7

injection aids, cartridges for the legally blind, syringes, insulin pumps and appurtenances to the
pumps, insulin infusion devices, and oral agents for controlling blood sugar and therapeutic/molded
shoes for the prevention of amputation. Upon the approval of new or improved diabetes equipment
and supplies by the Food and Drug Administration, all policies governed by this chapter shall
guarantee coverage of new diabetes equipment and supplies when medically appropriate and
prescribed by a physician. The policies shall also include coverage, when medically necessary, for
diabetes self-management education to ensure that persons with diabetes are instructed in the self-
management and treatment of their diabetes, including information on the nutritional management
of diabetes. The coverage for self-management education and education relating to medical
nutrition therapy shall be limited to medically necessary visits upon the diagnosis of diabetes, where
a physician diagnoses a significant change in the patient’s symptoms or conditions that necessitates
changes in a patient’s self-management, or where reeducation or refresher training is necessary.
This education, when medically necessary and prescribed by a physician, may be provided only by
the physician or upon his or her referral by an appropriately licensed and certified healthcare
provider and may be conducted in group settings. Coverage for self-management education and
education relating to medical nutrition therapy shall also include home visits when medically
necessary.
(b) Benefit plans offered by a hospital service corporation may impose copayment or
deductibles, or both, for the benefits mandated by this chapter, however, in no instance shall the
copayment or deductible amount be greater than the copayment or deductible amount imposed for
other supplies, equipment, or physician office visits. Benefits for services under this chapter shall
be reimbursed in accordance with the respective principles and mechanisms of reimbursement for
each insurer, hospital, or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization.
(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, coverage for equipment and supplies for insulin
administration and glucose monitoring shall have a cap on the amount that a covered person is
required to pay for such equipment and supplies at no more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per a
supply lasting thirty (30) days, or per item when an item is intended to be used for longer than thirty
(30) days. Coverage for such equipment and supplies shall not be subject to any annual deductible.
If the application of the cap to a specific item of equipment or supply before a covered person has
met their plan's deductible would result in health savings account ineligibility under 26 U.S.C. §
223, then the cap would only apply to that specific item of equipment or supply after the covered
person has met their plan's deductible.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-30 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC000999 - Page 3 of 7

27-20-30. Diabetes treatment.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes coverage for
physician services in a physician’s office, and every policy that provides major medical or similar
comprehensive-type coverage, shall include coverage for the following equipment and supplies for
the treatment of insulin treated diabetes, non-insulin treated diabetes, and gestational diabetes when
medically appropriate and prescribed by a physician: blood glucose monitors and blood glucose
monitors for the legally blind; test strips for glucose monitors and/or visual reading, insulin,
injection aids, cartridges for the legally blind, syringes, insulin pumps, and appurtenances to the
pumps, insulin infusion devices, and oral agents for controlling blood sugar and therapeutic/molded
shoes for the prevention of amputation. Upon the approval of new or improved diabetes equipment
and supplies by the Food and Drug Administration, all policies governed by this chapter shall
guarantee coverage of new diabetes equipment and supplies when medically appropriate and
prescribed by a physician. These policies shall also include coverage, when medically necessary,
for diabetes self-management education to ensure that persons with diabetes are instructed in the
self-management and treatment of their diabetes, including information on the nutritional
management of diabetes. The coverage for self-management education and education relating to
medical nutrition therapy shall be limited to medically necessary visits upon the diagnosis of
diabetes, where a physician diagnoses a significant change in the patient’s symptoms or conditions
that necessitates changes in a patient’s self-management, or where reeducation or refresher training
is necessary. This education, when medically necessary and prescribed by a physician, may be
provided only by the physician or, upon his or her referral, to an appropriately licensed and certified
healthcare provider, and may be conducted in group settings. Coverage for self-management
education and education relating to medical nutrition therapy shall also include home visits when
medically necessary.
(b) Benefit plans offered by a medical service corporation may impose copayment or
deductibles or both for the benefits mandated by this chapter, however, in no instance shall the
copayment or deductible amount be greater than the copayment or deductible amount imposed for
other supplies, equipment, or physician office visits. Benefits for services under this chapter shall
be reimbursed in accordance with the respective principles and mechanisms of reimbursement for
each insurer, hospital, or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization.
(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, coverage for equipment and supplies for insulin
administration and glucose monitoring shall have a cap on the amount that a covered person is
required to pay for such equipment and supplies at no more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per a
LC000999 - Page 4 of 7

supply lasting thirty (30) days, or per item when an item is intended to be used for longer than thirty
(30) days. Coverage for such equipment and supplies shall not be subject to any annual deductible.
If the application of the cap to a specific item of equipment or supply before a covered person has
met their plan's deductible would result in health savings account ineligibility under 26 U.S.C. §
223, then the cap would only apply to that specific item of equipment or supply after the covered
person has met their plan's deductible.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-44 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-44. Diabetes treatment.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes coverage for
physician services in a physician’s office and every policy that provides major medical or similar
comprehensive-type coverage shall include coverage for the following equipment and supplies for
the treatment of insulin treated diabetes, non-insulin treated diabetes, and gestational diabetes when
medically appropriate and prescribed by a physician: blood glucose monitors and blood glucose
monitors for the legally blind, test strips for glucose monitors and visual reading, insulin, injection
aids, cartridges for the legally blind, syringes, insulin pumps and appurtenances to them, insulin
infusion devices, oral agents for controlling blood sugar, and therapeutic/molded shoes for the
prevention of amputation. Upon the approval of new or improved diabetes equipment and supplies
by the Food and Drug Administration, all policies governed by this chapter shall guarantee
coverage of this new diabetes equipment and supplies when medically appropriate and prescribed
by a physician. These policies shall also include coverage, when medically necessary, for diabetes
self-management education to ensure that persons with diabetes are instructed in the self-
management and treatment of their diabetes, including information on the nutritional management
of diabetes. This coverage for self-management education and education relating to medical
nutrition therapy shall be limited to medically necessary visits upon the diagnosis of diabetes, where
a physician diagnoses a significant change in the patient’s symptoms or conditions that necessitates
changes in a patient’s self-management, or where reeducation or refresher training is necessary.
This education, when medically necessary and prescribed by a physician, may be provided only by
the physician or, upon his or her referral to an appropriately licensed and certified healthcare
provider and may be conducted in group settings. Coverage for self-management education and
education relating to medical nutrition therapy shall also include home visits when medically
necessary.
(b) Benefit plans offered by a health maintenance organization may impose copayment or
LC000999 - Page 5 of 7

deductibles, or both, for the benefits mandated by this chapter. However, in no instance shall the
copayment or deductible amount be greater than the copayment or deductible amount imposed for
other supplies, equipment, or physician office visits. Benefits for services under this chapter shall
be reimbursed in accordance with the respective principles and mechanisms of reimbursement for
each insurer, hospital, or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization.
(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, coverage for equipment and supplies for insulin
administration and glucose monitoring shall have a cap on the amount that a covered person is
required to pay for such equipment and supplies at no more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per a
supply lasting thirty (30) days, or per item when an item is intended to be used for longer than thirty
(30) days. Coverage for such equipment and supplies shall not be subject to any annual deductible.
If the application of the cap to a specific item of equipment or supply before a covered person has
met their plan's deductible would result in health savings account ineligibility under 26 U.S.C. §
223, then the cap would only apply to that specific item of equipment or supply after the covered
person has met their plan's deductible.
SECTION 5. Chapter 36-12 of the General Laws entitled "Insurance Benefits" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
36-12-2.6. Health insurance benefits - Diabetes treatment.
Commencing on and after January 1, 2026, when the health insurance plan for employees
of the State of Rhode Island is purchased or renewed by the director of administration pursuant to
§ 36-12-6, the plan shall provide for the coverage of equipment and supplies for insulin
administration and glucose monitoring, and shall have a cap on the amount that a covered person
is required to pay for such equipment and supplies at no more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per
a supply lasting thirty (30) days, or per item when an item is intended to be used for longer than
thirty (30) days. Coverage for such equipment and supplies shall not be subject to any annual
deductible. If the application of the cap to a specific item of equipment or supply before a covered
person has met their plan's deductible would result in health savings account ineligibility under 26
U.S.C. § 223, then the cap would only apply to that specific item of equipment or supply after the
covered person has met their plan's deductible.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000999
========
LC000999 - Page 6 of 7